Wisconsin, session 2025, SB830.
do enact as follows:SB830,11Section 1. 939.46 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB830,2,102939.46 (1m) A victim of a violation of s. 940.302 (2) or 948.051 has an 3affirmative defense for any offense committed as a direct result of the violation of s. 4940.302 (2) or 948.051 without regard to whether anyone was prosecuted or 5convicted for the violation of s. 940.302 (2) or 948.051. Under this subsection, an 6offense is committed as a direct result of a violation of s. 940.302 (2) or 948.051 if 7there is a logical, causal connection between the offense and the violation such that 8the offense is not the result, in significant part, of other events, circumstances, or 9considerations apart from the violation; the offense occurs in immediate proximity 10to the violation; and the offense is necessary to escape from or prevent the violation.SB830,211Section 2. Initial applicability.SB830,2,1312(1) This act first applies to an affirmative defense raised on the effective date 13of this subsection.SB830,2,1414